Arkansas, session 2025, SB559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-28-108(b)(2)(A), concerning entering
academic course requests for students under the Arkansas Military Child
School Transitions Act of 2021, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) A receiving district may shall enter academic course
requests on behalf of an incoming student under this section based on the
student's transcript of information sent by the student's family or the
student's sending district.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-28-108, concerning advance enrollment of
a student under the Arkansas Military Child School Transitions Act of 2021,
is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(e) A public school may seek a waiver from the State Board of
Education to accommodate a student under this section.


*TNL369*
03/21/2025 3:53:46 PM TNL369